Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1317
Educational telecommunications; commission;
establish fees.

The Nebraska Educational Telecommunications
Commission, in consultation with users of its telecommunications facilities,
networks, and equipment, may establish user fees, penalty fees, or other fees
as necessary for and consistent with the efficient and orderly use of its
facilities, networks, and equipment.

Laws 1995, LB 89, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-2103.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 973;

Laws 2014, LB692, § 5.